Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-702. Public Guardian for Adults — Appointment — Qualifications.

(1)The Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human Services or the Office of Chief Counsel's designee shall appoint an employee of the Office of Chief Counsel to serve as Public Guardian for Adults.

A prior authorized appointment of a public guardian by the Director of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services shall have continuing effect and be relied upon in regard to the public guardian's authority to act on behalf of the ward.

(1)In addition to the qualifications required under §28-65-203, the public guardian shall:

Hold a degree in law or social work or a related field;

Submit to a criminal background check with satisfactory results as prescribed by the Department of Human Services;

Attend and complete at least twenty (20) hours of training approved by the department; and

Demonstrate competency and ability to carry out the values of the ward.

The Public Guardian for Adults shall devote his or her entire time to the duties of the Office of Public Guardian for Adults.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4; 2015, No. 1203, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 913, § 132.

28-65-703. Public Guardian for Adults — Duties.

The Public Guardian for Adults:

Shall administer and organize the work of the Office of Public Guardian for Adults;

May employ staff as necessary to carry out the functions of the office, including the employment of Deputy Public Guardians for Adults who:

A court shall not appoint the Public Guardian for Adults as the guardian of a person or estate unless the Public Guardian for Adults petitions for the guardianship and consents to the appointment.

The Public Guardian for Adults has probable cause to believe that the adult lacks the capacity to make and communicate decisions necessary for his or her health, safety, and welfare or to manage his or her property;

The Public Guardian for Adults believes that the adult is incapacitated;

There is no suitable private guardian qualified and willing to accept the guardianship appointment; and

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4; 2013, No. 582, § 1; 2015, No. 1203, § 4.

28-65-704. Correspondence and legal process.

All correspondence and legal process regarding a public guardianship under this subchapter shall be to or from the Public Guardian for Adults in his or her official capacity.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4.

28-65-705. No bond, fee, or copy charge required.

Bond shall not be required in connection with public guardian services under this subchapter.

A fee may not be charged or collected by the circuit clerk or county clerk in connection with public guardian services under this subchapter, including without limitation fees for filing, summons, or subpoenas.

The Department of Human Services is not required to pay for a copy of medical, mental health, financial, or other records that relate to a ward who is under the guardianship of a Public Guardian for Adults.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “or fee” in the section heading; inserted designation (a); and added (b).

The 2019 amendment added (c).

Guardian of the person of the ward, the Public Guardian for Adults shall:

File a report with the court; and

Petition the court to terminate the guardianship of the Public Guardian for Adults over the deceased ward;

Guardian of the estate of the ward, the Public Guardian for Adults shall:

File a final account of the administration of the estate of the ward by the Public Guardian for Adults until the date of the death of the ward;

Cause a notice of the filing of the final account to be published;

Provide a copy of the final account and notice of the death of the ward to the Department of Human Services; and

Petition the court to terminate the guardianship of the Public Guardian for Adults over the deceased ward; or

Guardian of the person and the estate of the ward:

File a final report and final account of the administration of the estate of the ward by the Public Guardian for Adults until the date of the death of the ward;

Cause a notice of the filing of the final account to be published;

Provide a copy of the final account and notice of the death of the ward to the department; and

Petition the court to terminate the guardianship of the Public Guardian for Adults over the deceased ward.

Upon the petition of the Public Guardian for Adults to terminate the guardianship of a deceased ward, the court shall:

Conduct a hearing on the petition of the Public Guardian for Adults to terminate the guardianship and consider the petition, the delivery of funds, and the payment of funds for the disposition of the body of the ward as provided in this subsection;

Terminate the guardianship;

Discharge the Public Guardian for Adults from any further duty, liability, and accountability with regard to the guardianship and the estate of the deceased ward;

Direct delivery of the funds of the deceased ward to the appropriate person or, if no appropriate person is available, to the registry of the court pursuant to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure; and

With regard to the disposal of the body of the ward:

Direct the payment of funds for the disposal of the body of the ward in a manner provided in a prior arrangement made by the ward of the Public Guardian for Adults;

Direct the payment of funds to dispose of the body of the ward if a prior arrangement was not made by the ward; or

Consent to donate the body of the ward to medical science.

The estate of the deceased ward shall be distributed in accordance with the law on the administration of decedents' estates.

The discharge of a Public Guardian for Adults is final.

The Public Guardian for Adults and the department are not responsible for any costs, including without limitation costs related to the disposition of the body of the ward.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “may terminate the guardianship as provided under §28-65-401 et seq., and subject to the procedures required under this section” for “shall not terminate the guardianship of a living ward of the Public Guardian for Adults unless the court declares that the ward is restored to capacity or a successor guardian is appointed” in (a); andadded (c) through (f).

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4; 2015, No. 1203, § 5; 2019, No. 955, § 3.

28-65-706. Termination of guardianships.

The court having jurisdiction of the ward may terminate the guardianship as provided under §28-65-401 et seq., and subject to the procedures required under this section.

Neither the Public Guardian for Adults, the Office of Public Guardian for Adults, nor a volunteer shall be entitled to compensation under §28-65-108.

Within forty (40) days after the death of the ward of a Public Guardian for Adults if the Public Guardian for Adults is the:

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4; 2019, No. 529, §§ 1, 2.

28-65-707. Department of Human Services — Adoption of rules.

The Department of Human Services may adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 4.